Florida, session 2026, SB314.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 129 130 Section 1.âPresent subsections (17) through (32), (33), 131 (34), and (35) and (36) through (39) of section 560.103, Florida 132 Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, are 133 redesignated as subsections (18) through (33), (35), (36), and 134 (37), and (39) through (42), respectively, new subsections (17) 135 and (34) and subsection (38) are added to that section, and 136 present subsection (25) of that section is amended, to read: 137 560.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 138 (17)ââFederal-qualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means 139 any of the following: 140 (a)âA nonbank entity, other than a state-qualified payment 141 stablecoin issuer, approved by the Office of the Comptroller of 142 the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. 143 (b)âAn uninsured national bank that is chartered by the 144 Office of the Comptroller of the Currency pursuant to title LXII 145 of the Revised Statutes and is approved to issue payment 146 stablecoins. As used in this section, the term ânational bankâ 147 has the same meaning as in the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 148 (c)âA federal branch that is approved by the Office of the 149 Comptroller of the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. For 150 purposes of this section, the term âfederal branchâ has the same 151 meaning as in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 152 U.S.C. s. 1813. 153 (26)(25)ââMoney services businessâ means any person located 154 in or doing business in this state, from this state, or into 155 this state from locations outside this state or country who acts 156 as a payment instrument seller, foreign currency exchanger, 157 check casher, or money transmitter, or qualified payment 158 stablecoin issuer. 159 (34)ââPayment stablecoinâ means a digital asset that meets 160 all of the following requirements: 161 (a)1.âIs, or is designed to be, used as a means of payment 162 or settlement; and 163 2.âThe issuer of which: 164 a.âIs obligated to convert, redeem, or repurchase the 165 digital asset for a fixed amount of monetary value, not 166 including a digital asset denominated in a fixed amount of 167 monetary value. 168 b.âRepresents that such issuer will maintain, or create the 169 reasonable expectation that it will maintain, a stable value 170 relative to the value of a fixed amount of monetary value. 171 (b)âThe term does not include a digital asset that is any 172 of the following: 173 1.âA national currency. For purposes of this subparagraph, 174 the term ânational currencyâ means each of the following: 175 a.âA Federal Reserve note as the term is used in the first 176 undesignated paragraph of s. 16 of the Federal Reserve Act, 12 177 U.S.C. s. 411. 178 b.âMoney standing to the credit of an account with a 179 Federal Reserve Bank. 180 c.âMoney issued by a foreign central bank. 181 d.âMoney issued by an intergovernmental organization 182 pursuant to an agreement by two or more governments. 183 2.âA deposit as defined in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit 184 Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, including a deposit recorded 185 using distributed ledger technology. For purposes of this 186 subparagraph, the term âdistributed ledgerâ means technology in 187 which data is shared across a network that creates a public 188 digital ledger of verified transactions or information among 189 network participants and cryptography is used to link the data 190 to maintain the integrity of the public ledger and execute other 191 functions. 192 3.âA security, as defined in s. 517.021, s. 2 of the 193 Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. s. 77b, s. 3 of the Securities 194 and Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. s. 78c, or s. 2 of the 195 Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. s. 80a-2. 196 (c)âAs used in this subsection, the term âdigital assetâ 197 means any digital representation of value recorded on a 198 cryptographically secured digital ledger. 199 (38)ââQualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means an entity 200 that: 201 (a)âIs legally established under the laws of a state and 202 approved to issue payment stablecoins by the office; and 203 (b)âIs not an uninsured national bank chartered by the 204 Comptroller pursuant to title LXII of the Revised Statutes, a 205 federal branch, an insured depository institution, or a 206 subsidiary of such national bank, federal branch, or insured 207 depository institution. The terms ânational bankâ and âfederal 208 branchâ have the same meaning as in subsection (17). The term 209 âinsured depository institutionâ has the same meaning as defined 210 in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, 211 and an insured credit union. 212 Section 2.âEffective October 1, 2026, present subsection 213 (9) of section 560.123, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as 214 subsection (10), a new subsection (9) is added to that section, 215 and subsections (2), (3), and (8) of that section are amended, 216 to read: 217 560.123âFlorida Control of Money Laundering in Money 218 Services Business Act.â 219 (2)âThe purpose of this section is to require the 220 maintenance of certain records of transactions involving 221 currency, monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual 222 currency, or payment stablecoins in order to deter the use of a 223 money services business to conceal proceeds from criminal 224 activity and to ensure the availability of such records for 225 criminal, tax, or regulatory investigations or proceedings. 226 (3)âA money services business shall keep a record, as 227 prescribed by the commission, of each financial transaction 228 occurring in this state which it knows to involve currency, 229 monetary value, a payment instrument, or virtual currency, or a 230 payment stablecoin having a value greater than $10,000; to 231 involve the proceeds of specified unlawful activity; or to be 232 designed to evade the reporting requirements of this section or 233 chapter 896. The money services business must maintain 234 appropriate procedures to ensure compliance with this section 235 and chapter 896. 236 (a)âMultiple financial transactions shall be treated as a 237 single transaction if the money services business has knowledge 238 that they are made by or on behalf of any one person and result 239 in value in or value out totaling a value of more than $10,000 240 during any day. 241 (b)âA money services business may keep a record of any 242 financial transaction occurring in this state, regardless of the 243 value, if it suspects that the transaction involves the proceeds 244 of unlawful activity. 245 (c)âThe money services business must file a report with the 246 office of any records required by this subsection, at such time 247 and containing such information as required by rule. The timely 248 filing of the report required by 31 U.S.C. s. 5313 with the 249 appropriate federal agency shall be deemed compliance with the 250 reporting requirements of this subsection unless the reports are 251 not regularly and comprehensively transmitted by the federal 252 agency to the office. 253 (d)âA money services business, or control person, employee, 254 or agent thereof, that files a report in good faith pursuant to 255 this section is not liable to any person for loss or damage 256 caused in whole or in part by the making, filing, or 257 governmental use of the report, or any information contained 258 therein. 259 (8)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), a person who 260 willfully violates any provision of this section commits a 261 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 262 775.082 or s. 775.083. 263 (b)âA person who willfully violates any provision of this 264 section, if the violation involves: 265 1.âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 266 virtual currency, or payment stablecoins of a value exceeding 267 $300 but less than $20,000 in any 12-month period, commits a 268 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 269 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 270 2.âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 271 virtual currency, or payment stablecoins of a value totaling or 272 exceeding $20,000 but less than $100,000 in any 12-month period, 273 commits a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in 274 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 275 3.âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 276 virtual currency, or payment stablecoins of a value totaling or 277 exceeding $100,000 in any 12-month period, commits a felony of 278 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 279 775.083, or s. 775.084. 280 (c)âIn addition to the penalties authorized by s. 775.082, 281 s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, a person who has been convicted of, 282 or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, regardless of 283 adjudication, to having violated paragraph (b) may be sentenced 284 to pay a fine of up to the greater of $250,000 or twice the 285 value of the currency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 286 virtual currency, or payment stablecoins, except that on a 287 second or subsequent conviction for or plea of guilty or nolo 288 contendere, regardless of adjudication, to a violation of 289 paragraph (b), the fine may be up to the greater of $500,000 or 290 quintuple the value of the currency, monetary value, payment 291 instruments, or virtual currency, or payment stablecoins. 292 (d)âA person who violates this section is also liable for a 293 civil penalty of up to the greater of the value of the currency, 294 monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual currency, or 295 payment stablecoins involved or $25,000. 296 (9)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer must comply with 297 any anti-money laundering provisions in the GENIUS Act under 298 Pub. L. No. 119-27, which includes, but is not limited to, 299 provisions relating to economic sanctions, prevention of money 300 laundering, customer identification, and due diligence in the 301 Bank Secrecy Act, s. 21 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 302 U.S.C. s. 1813, chapter 2 of Title I of Pub. L. No. 91-508, and 303 subchapter II of chapter 53 of Title 31, United States Code, and 304 any other applicable federal anti-money laundering provisions. 305 (a)âNot later than 180 days after the approval of an 306 application for a license as a qualified payment stablecoin 307 issuer pursuant to this chapter, and on an annual basis 308 thereafter, each qualified payment stablecoin issuer shall 309 submit to the office a certification that the issuer has 310 implemented anti-money laundering and economic sanctions 311 compliance programs that are reasonably designed to prevent the 312 qualified payment stablecoin issuer from facilitating money 313 laundering, in particular, facilitating money laundering for 314 cartels and organizations designated as foreign terrorist 315 organizations under s. 219 of the Immigration and Nationality 316 Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1189, and the financing of terrorist 317 activities, consistent with the requirements of the act. 318 (b)âThe office shall make the certifications described in 319 paragraph (a) available to the Secretary of the Treasury upon 320 request. 321 (c)âThe office may revoke the license of the qualified 322 payment stablecoin issuer if such issuer does not submit the 323 certification required under paragraph (a). 324 (d)âIf the office has reason to believe that any person has 325 knowingly violated paragraph (a), which may be subject to 326 federal criminal penalties set forth under 18 U.S.C. s. 1001, 327 the office may refer the matter to the United States Attorney 328 General or the attorney general of this state. 329 Section 3.âEffective October 1, 2026, paragraph (a) of 330 subsection (5) and subsection (6) of section 560.125, Florida 331 Statutes, are amended to read: 332 560.125âUnlicensed activity; penalties.â 333 (5)âA person who violates this section, if the violation 334 involves: 335 (a)âCurrency, monetary value, payment instruments, or 336 virtual currency, or payment stablecoins of a value exceeding 337 $300 but less than $20,000 in any 12-month period, commits a 338 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 339 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 340 (6)âIn addition to the penalties authorized by s. 775.082, 341 s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, a person who has been convicted of, 342 or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, having 343 violated this section may be sentenced to pay a fine of up to 344 the greater of $250,000 or twice the value of the currency, 345 monetary value, payment instruments, or virtual currency, or 346 payment stablecoins, except that on a second or subsequent 347 violation of this section the fine may be up to the greater of 348 $500,000 or quintuple the value of the currency, monetary value, 349 payment instruments, or virtual currency. 350 Section 4.âPart V of chapter 560, Florida Statutes, 351 consisting of ss. 560.501-560.506, Florida Statutes, is created 352 and entitled âPayment Stablecoin Issuers.â 353 Section 5.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 560.501, 354 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 355 560.501âLicense requirement; exemptions; transition to 356 federal oversight; definitions.â 357 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âFor purposes of this section, the term: 358 (a)ââHome stateâ means a state other than this state in 359 which a payment stablecoin issuer is established or has its 360 principal place of business. 361 (b)ââHost stateâ means a state in which the payment 362 stablecoin issuer establishes a branch, solicits customers, or 363 otherwise engages in business activities, other than the home 364 state. 365 (c)ââOut-of-state state-qualified payment stablecoin 366 issuerâ means a payment stablecoin issuer that has been approved 367 in accordance with the requirements of the GENIUS Act by the 368 payment stablecoin issuerâs home state, other than this state, 369 to issue payment stablecoin. 370 (2)âLICENSE REQUIREMENT.âEffective October 1, 2026, a 371 person may not engage in the activity of a qualified payment 372 stablecoin issuer in this state unless the person is licensed or 373 exempted from licensure under this chapter. The office shall 374 give written notice to each applicant that the office has 375 granted or denied the application for a license as a qualified 376 payment stablecoin issuer. 377 (3)âEXEMPTION FROM LICENSURE.â 378 (a)âSubsection (2) does not apply to: 379 1.âA federal-qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 380 2.âAn out-of-state state-qualified payment stablecoin 381 issuer of which this state is a host state. An out-of-state 382 state-qualified payment stablecoin issuer must provide written 383 notice to the office within 30 days after engaging in activity 384 that makes this state a host state of such issuer. 385 (b)âThe following transactions are not regulated under this 386 part: 387 1.âThe direct transfer of payment stablecoins between two 388 individuals acting on their own behalf and for their own lawful 389 purposes, without the involvement of an intermediary. 390 2.âAny transaction involving the receipt of payment 391 stablecoins by an individual between an account owned by the 392 individual in the United States and an account owned by the 393 individual abroad which are offered by the same parent company. 394 3.âAny transaction by means of a software or hardware 395 wallet that facilitates an individualâs own custody of payment 396 stablecoins. 397 (c)âA payment stablecoin that meets the requirements of 398 this part is not a security and is not subject to chapter 517. 399 (4)âTRANSITION TO FEDERAL OVERSIGHT.â 400 (a)âUnless a federal waiver is obtained, a qualified 401 payment stablecoin issuer with a consolidated total outstanding 402 payment stablecoin issuance that reaches the $10 billion 403 threshold must comply with one of the following requirements: 404 1.âNot later than 360 days after the payment stablecoin 405 issuance reaches such threshold, transition to the applicable 406 federal regulatory framework administered jointly by the office 407 and the United States Office of the Comptroller of the Currency; 408 or 409 2.âBeginning on the date the payment stablecoin issuance 410 reaches such threshold, cease issuing new payment stablecoins 411 until the payment stablecoin falls below the $10 billion 412 consolidated total outstanding issuance threshold. 413 (b)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer with a 414 consolidated total outstanding payment stablecoin issuance that 415 reaches the $10 billion threshold must, within 7 business days, 416 provide notice to the office that the threshold has been 417 reached. 418 (c)âTo the extent or for any relevant period for which a 419 waiver or transition applies, a qualified payment stablecoin 420 issuer remains subject to this part if a federal waiver of the 421 transition requirements in paragraph (a) is obtained pursuant to 422 the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, and the office remains 423 solely responsible for supervising the qualified payment 424 stablecoin issuer, or if the office is jointly responsible with 425 the United States Office of the Comptroller of the Currency to 426 supervise the qualified payment stablecoin issuer pursuant to 427 subparagraph (a)1. The office may enter into an agreement with 428 the relevant primary federal payment stablecoin regulator for 429 the joint supervision of any qualified payment stablecoin 430 issuer. 431 Section 6.âSection 560.502, Florida Statutes, is created to 432 read: 433 560.502âAdditional license application requirements; office 434 duties; application forms.â 435 (1)âADDITIONAL LICENSE APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS.âIn 436 addition to the license requirements under part I of this 437 chapter, an applicant seeking a license under this part must 438 also submit to the office an application on a form prescribed by 439 rule of the commission. Such application must include all of the 440 following: 441 (a)âEvidence of the ability of the applicant, based on 442 financial condition and resources, to meet the requirements in 443 s. 560.504. 444 (b)âA statement as to whether an individual who has been 445 convicted of a felony offense involving insider trading, 446 embezzlement, cybercrime, money laundering, financing terrorism, 447 or financial fraud is serving as an officer or director of the 448 applicant. 449 (c)âAn explanation of the competence, experience, and 450 integrity of the officers, directors, and principal shareholders 451 of the applicant, its subsidiaries, and parent company which 452 includes, but is not limited to: 453 1.âThe record of those officers, directors, and principal 454 shareholders of compliance with laws and regulations; and 455 2.âThe ability of those officers, directors, and principal 456 shareholders to fulfill any commitments to, and any conditions 457 imposed by, the office in connection with the application at 458 issue and any prior applications. 459 (d)âA statement as to whether the redemption policy of the 460 applicant meets the standards under s. 560.504. 461 (e)âAny other factors necessary to ensure the safety and 462 soundness of the qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 463 (2)âOFFICE DUTIES.âThe office shall comply with the 464 following requirements: 465 (a)âUpon receipt of a substantially complete application, 466 evaluate and make a determination on each application based on 467 the criteria established in this section. 468 (b)âNot later than 120 days after receiving a substantially 469 complete application, render a decision on the application. 470 1.âAn application is considered substantially complete if 471 the application contains sufficient information for the office 472 to render a decision on whether the applicant satisfies the 473 factors described in paragraph (1)(a). 474 2.âNot later than 30 days after receiving an application 475 under this section, the office shall notify the applicant as to 476 whether the office considers the application to be substantially 477 complete and, if the application is not substantially complete, 478 the additional information the applicant must provide in order 479 for the application to be considered substantially complete. 480 3.âAn application considered substantially complete under 481 this subparagraph remains substantially complete unless there is 482 a material change in circumstances that requires the office to 483 treat the application as a new application. 484 4.âIf the office fails to render a decision on a complete 485 application within the time specified in paragraph (2)(b), the 486 application is deemed approved. 487 (c)âDeny a substantially complete application received 488 pursuant to this subsection only if the office determines that 489 the activities of the applicant would be unsafe or unsound based 490 on the factors described in paragraph (1)(a). 491 1.âThe issuance of a payment stablecoin on an open, public, 492 or decentralized network is not a valid ground for denial of an 493 application for approval as a qualified payment stablecoin 494 issuer. 495 2.âIf the office denies a complete application submitted 496 pursuant to this subsection, not later than 30 days after the 497 date of such denial, the office must provide the applicant with 498 written notice explaining the denial with specificity, including 499 all findings made by the regulator with respect to all 500 identified material shortcomings in the application, along with 501 actionable recommendations on how the applicant could address 502 the identified material shortcomings. 503 3.âDenial of an application under this section does not 504 prohibit the applicant from filing a subsequent application. 505 4.âA denial entitles the applicant to an opportunity to be 506 heard pursuant to chapter 120. 507 (d)âPay fingerprint retention fees that are charged for the 508 retention of any fingerprints that are required for each control 509 person of the applicant to obtain a license as a qualified 510 payment stablecoin issuer in accordance with this chapter. 511 (3)âAPPLICATION FORMS.âThe information required in the 512 application form prescribed by rule of the commission under 513 subsection (1) may be incorporated in other licensing 514 application forms required under this chapter, as appropriate, 515 to allow a person to apply for two licenses in one application 516 form in order to streamline the application process. 517 Section 7.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 560.503, 518 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 519 560.503âLimitation on payment stablecoin activities.âA 520 licensed qualified payment stablecoin issuer may engage only in 521 the following activities: 522 (1)âIssue payment stablecoins. 523 (2)âRedeem payment stablecoins. 524 (3)âManage related reserves, including purchasing, selling, 525 and holding reserve assets or providing custodial services for 526 reserve assets, consistent with federal law and the laws of this 527 state. 528 (4)âUndertake other activities that directly support any of 529 the activities described in this section. 530 Section 8.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 560.504, 531 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 532 560.504âMinimum prudential requirements.â 533 (1)âIn accordance with the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, 534 a qualified payment stablecoin issuer must comply with all of 535 the following requirements: 536 (a)âMaintain identifiable reserves backing the outstanding 537 payment stablecoins of the qualified payment stablecoin issuer 538 on at least a one-to-one basis, with reserves consisting of any 539 of the following: 540 1.âUnited States coin or currency or money standing to the 541 credit of an account with a Federal Reserve Bank. 542 2.âFunds held as demand deposits or insured shares at an 543 insured depository institution, subject to limitations 544 established by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the 545 National Credit Union Administration. 546 3.âUnited States Treasury bills, notes, or bonds with a 547 remaining maturity or issued with a maturity of 93 days or less. 548 4.âMoney received under repurchase agreements, with the 549 qualified payment stablecoin issuer acting as a seller of 550 securities and with an overnight maturity, which are backed by 551 United States Treasury bills with a maturity of 93 days or less. 552 5.âReverse purchase agreements, with the qualified payment 553 stablecoin issuer acting as a purchaser of securities and with 554 an overnight maturity, that are collateralized by United States 555 Treasury bills, notes, or bonds on an overnight basis, subject 556 to overcollateralization in line with standard market terms that 557 meet federal requirements in the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 558 6.âSecurities issued by an investment company registered 559 under s. 8(a) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 560 s. 80a-8(a), or other registered government money market fund, 561 and that are invested solely in underlying assets described in 562 subparagraphs 1.-5. 563 7.âAny other similarly liquid Federal Government-issued 564 asset approved by the primary federal payment stablecoin 565 regulator, in consultation with the office. 566 8.âAny reserve described in subparagraphs 1., 2., and 3. or 567 subparagraph 6. or subparagraph 7. in tokenized form, provided 568 that such reserves comply with all applicable laws and 569 regulations. 570 (b)âPublicly disclose the issuerâs redemption policy, which 571 must comply with all of the following requirements: 572 1.âEstablish clear and conspicuous procedures for timely 573 redemption of outstanding payment stablecoins. 574 2.âPublicly, clearly, and conspicuously disclose in plain 575 language all fees associated with purchasing or redeeming the 576 payment stablecoins, provided that such fees can be changed only 577 upon not less than 7 daysâ prior notice to consumers. 578 (c)âPublish on the issuerâs website a monthly reserve 579 composition of the issuerâs reserve which must contain all of 580 the following information: 581 1.âThe total number of outstanding payment stablecoins 582 issued by the issuer. 583 2.âThe amount and composition of the reserves described in 584 paragraph (a), including the average tenor and geographic 585 location of custody of each category of reserve instruments. 586 (d)âComply with all federal prohibitions on pledging, 587 rehypothecating, or reusing reserve assets, either directly or 588 indirectly, except for any of the following purposes: 589 1.âSatisfying margin obligations in connection with 590 investments in permitted reserves under subparagraph (a)4. or 591 subparagraph (a)5. 592 2.âSatisfying obligations associated with the use, receipt, 593 or provision of standard custodial services. 594 3.âCreating liquidity to meet reasonable expectations of 595 requests to redeem payment stablecoins, such that reserves in 596 the form of United States Treasury bills may be sold as 597 purchased securities for repurchase agreements with a maturity 598 of 93 days or less, provided that either: 599 a.âThe repurchase agreements are cleared by a clearing 600 agency registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission; 601 or 602 b.âThe qualified payment stablecoin issuer receives prior 603 approval from the office. 604 (e)âEngage a registered public accounting firm to conduct a 605 monthly examination of the previous month-end reserve report. 606 For purposes of this paragraph, the term âregistered public 607 accounting firmâ means a public accounting firm registered with 608 the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board. 609 (f)âSubmit to the office each month a certification as to 610 the accuracy of the month-end reserve report by the qualified 611 payment stablecoin issuerâs chief executive officer and chief 612 financial officer. Whoever knowingly makes a false statement in 613 writing with the intent to mislead a public servant in the 614 performance of his or her official duty commits a misdemeanor of 615 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 616 775.083. 617 (g)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer with more than 618 $50 billion in consolidated total outstanding issuance shall 619 prepare, in accordance with generally accepted accounting 620 principles, an annual financial statement, which must include 621 disclosure of any related party transactions, as defined by such 622 generally accepted accounting principles. 623 1.âA registered public accounting firm must perform an 624 audit of the annual financial statements. 625 2.âEach qualified payment stablecoin issuer required to 626 prepare an audited annual financial statement must comply with 627 all of the following requirements: 628 a.âMake such audited financial statements publicly 629 available on the website of the permitted payment stablecoin 630 issuer; and 631 b.âSubmit such audited financial statements annually to the 632 office. 633 (h)âComply with any federal regulations or rules prescribed 634 by commission relating to capital, liquidity, and risk 635 management requirements. 636 (i)âEngage only custodians or safekeepers that comply with 637 s. 10 of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 638 (j)âComply with any other federal requirements of s. 4(a) 639 of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, and any implementing 640 federal regulations. 641 (2)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer is prohibited 642 from engaging in all of the following conduct: 643 (a)âExcept as may be authorized under federal law, tying 644 arrangements that condition access to stablecoin services on the 645 purchase of unrelated products or services from such qualified 646 payment stablecoin issuer or an agreement not to obtain products 647 or services from a competitor. 648 (b)âUsing deceptive names, which includes, but is not 649 limited to, any of the following: 650 1.âUsing any combination of terms relating to the United 651 States Government, except abbreviations directly related to the 652 currency to which a payment stablecoin is pegged, such as âUSD.â 653 2.âMarketing a payment stablecoin in such a way that a 654 reasonable person would perceive the payment stablecoin to be 655 legal tender, as described in 31 U.S.C. s. 5103, issued by the 656 United States, or guaranteed or approved by the United States 657 Government. 658 (c)âPaying the holder of any payment stablecoin any form of 659 interest or yield solely in connection with holding, use, or 660 retention of such payment stablecoin if such payment is 661 prohibited under federal law. 662 Section 9.âSection 560.505, Florida Statutes, is created to 663 read: 664 560.505âState certification.â 665 (1)âThe office shall submit an initial certification to the 666 federal Stablecoin Certification Review Committee, on a form 667 prescribed by the committee, in accordance with the timeline 668 established by the committee for accepting certifications, 669 attesting that the state regulatory regime meets the criteria 670 for substantial similarity to the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119 671 27, as required under that act. 672 (2)âNo later than the date to be determined by the United 673 States Secretary of the Treasury each year, the office must 674 submit to the Stablecoin Certification Review Committee an 675 additional certification that confirms the accuracy of the 676 initial certification submitted. 677 (3)âThe office must comply with the requirements of s. 678 4(c)(4) of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, to ensure the 679 state receives certification and annual recertification by the 680 Stablecoin Certification Review Committee of the state 681 regulatory regime. 682 Section 10.âSection 560.506, Florida Statutes, is created 683 to read: 684 560.506âRulemaking authority.âThe commission shall adopt 685 rules to administer this part as required in s. 13 of the GENIUS 686 Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. The commission shall also adopt rules 687 relating to capital, liquidity, and risk management which are 688 consistent with section 4(a)(4) of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 689 119-27. The commission may adopt rules establishing standards 690 for the conduct, supervision, examination, and regulation of 691 qualified payment stablecoin issuers, including requirements 692 relating to reserves, customer-asset protection, reporting, and 693 compliance, in order to meet the minimum requirements 694 established by the Stablecoin Certification Review Committee. 695 Section 11.âSubsection (12) is added to section 655.50, 696 Florida Statutes, and paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of that 697 section is amended, to read: 698 655.50âFlorida Control of Money Laundering and Terrorist 699 Financing in Financial Institutions Act.â 700 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 701 (e)ââMonetary instrumentsâ means coin or currency of the 702 United States or of any other country, payment stablecoins as 703 defined in s. 658.997, travelersâ checks, personal checks, bank 704 checks, money orders, stored value cards, prepaid cards, 705 investment securities or negotiable instruments in bearer form 706 or otherwise in such form that title thereto passes upon 707 delivery, or similar devices. 708 (12)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer, as defined in 709 s. 658.997, must comply with any anti-money laundering 710 provisions in the GENIUS Act under Pub. L. No. 119-27, which 711 includes, but is not limited to, provisions relating to economic 712 sanctions, prevention of money laundering, customer 713 identification, and due diligence in the Bank Secrecy Act, s. 21 714 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, chapter 715 2 of Title I of Pub. L. No. 91-508, and subchapter II of chapter 716 53 of Title 31, United States Code, and any other applicable 717 federal anti-money laundering provisions. 718 (a)âNot later than 180 days after the approval of an 719 application for certificate of approval as a qualified payment 720 stablecoin issuer pursuant to s. 658.997, and on an annual basis 721 thereafter, each qualified payment stablecoin issuer shall 722 submit to the office a certification that the issuer has 723 implemented anti-money laundering and economic sanctions 724 compliance programs that are reasonably designed to prevent the 725 qualified payment stablecoin issuer from facilitating money 726 laundering, in particular, facilitating money laundering for 727 cartels and organizations designated as foreign terrorist 728 organizations under s. 219 of the Immigration and Nationality 729 Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1189, and the financing of terrorist 730 activities, consistent with the requirements of the act. 731 (b)âThe office shall make the certifications described in 732 paragraph (a) available to the Secretary of the Treasury upon 733 request. 734 (c)âThe office may revoke the certificate of approval of 735 the qualified payment stablecoin issuer if the qualified payment 736 stablecoin issuer does not submit the certification required 737 under paragraph (a). 738 (d)âIf the office has reason to believe that any person has 739 knowingly violated paragraph (a), which may be subject to 740 federal criminal penalties set forth under 18 U.S.C. s. 1001, 741 the office may refer the matter to the United States Attorney 742 General or the Attorney General of this state. 743 Section 12.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (1) of 744 section 658.19, Florida Statutes, to read: 745 658.19âApplication for authority to organize a bank or 746 trust company.â 747 (1)âA written application for authority to organize a 748 banking corporation or a trust company shall be filed with the 749 office by the proposed directors and shall include: 750 (h)âA request for a certificate of approval as a qualified 751 payment stablecoin issuer, as defined in s. 658.997, if desired 752 in connection with an application to organize a trust company. 753 Section 13.âSection 658.997, Florida Statutes, is created 754 to read: 755 658.997âQualified payment stablecoin issuers.â 756 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 757 (a)ââFederal-qualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means any 758 of the following: 759 1.âA nonbank entity, other than a state-qualified payment 760 stablecoin issuer, approved by the Office of the Comptroller of 761 the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. 762 2.âAn uninsured national bank that is chartered by the 763 Office of the Comptroller of the Currency pursuant to title LXII 764 of the Revised Statutes and is approved to issue payment 765 stablecoins. As used in this subsection, the term ânational 766 bankâ has the same meaning as in the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 767 119-27. 768 3.âA federal branch that is approved by the Office of the 769 Comptroller of the Currency to issue payment stablecoins. For 770 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âfederal branchâ has the 771 same meaning as in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance 772 Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813. 773 (b)ââHome stateâ means a state other than this state in 774 which a payment stablecoin issuer is established or has its 775 principal place of business. 776 (c)ââHost stateâ means a state in which the payment 777 stablecoin issuer establishes a branch, solicits customers, or 778 otherwise engages in business activities, other than the home 779 state. 780 (d)ââOut-of-state state-qualified payment stablecoin 781 issuerâ means a payment stablecoin issuer that has been approved 782 in accordance with the requirements of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. 783 No. 119-27, by the payment stablecoin issuerâs home state, other 784 than this state, to issue payment stablecoin. 785 (e)ââPayment stablecoinâ means a digital asset that meets 786 all of the following requirements: 787 1.a.âIs, or is designed to be, used as a means of payment 788 or settlement; and 789 b.âThe issuer of which: 790 (I)âIs obligated to convert, redeem, or repurchase the 791 digital asset for a fixed amount of monetary value, not 792 including a digital asset denominated in a fixed amount of 793 monetary value. 794 (II)âRepresents that such issuer will maintain, or create 795 the reasonable expectation that it will maintain, a stable value 796 relative to the value of a fixed amount of monetary value. 797 2.âThe term does not include a digital asset that is any of 798 the following: 799 a.âA national currency. For purposes of this subparagraph, 800 the term ânational currencyâ means each of the following: 801 (I)âA Federal Reserve note as the term is used in the first 802 undesignated paragraph of s. 16 of the Federal Reserve Act, 12 803 U.S.C. s. 411. 804 (II)âMoney standing to the credit of an account with a 805 Federal Reserve Bank. 806 (III)âMoney issued by a foreign central bank. 807 (IV)âMoney issued by an intergovernmental organization 808 pursuant to an agreement by two or more governments. 809 b.âA deposit as defined in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit 810 Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, including a deposit recorded 811 using distributed ledger technology. For purposes of this 812 subparagraph, the term âdistributed ledgerâ means technology in 813 which data is shared across a network that creates a public 814 digital ledger of verified transactions or information among 815 network participants and cryptography is used to link the data 816 to maintain the integrity of the public ledger and execute other 817 functions. 818 c.âA security, as defined in s. 517.021, s. 2 of the 819 Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. s. 77b, s. 3 of the Securities 820 and Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. s. 78c, or s. 2 of the 821 Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. s. 80a-2. 822 3.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âdigital assetâ 823 means any digital representation of value that is recorded on a 824 cryptographically secured digital ledger. 825 (f)ââQualified payment stablecoin issuerâ means an entity 826 that: 827 1.âIs legally established under the laws of a state and 828 approved to issue payment stablecoins by the office; and 829 2.âIs not an uninsured national bank chartered by the 830 Comptroller pursuant to title LXII of the Revised Statutes, a 831 federal branch, an insured depository institution, or a 832 subsidiary of such national bank, federal branch, or insured 833 depository institution. The terms ânational bankâ and âfederal 834 branchâ have the same meaning as in subsection (17). The term 835 âinsured depository institutionâ has the same meaning as defined 836 in s. 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. s. 1813, 837 and an insured credit union. 838 (2)âAPPROVAL REQUIREMENT.âEffective October 1, 2026, a 839 trust company may not engage in the activity of a qualified 840 payment stablecoin issuer in this state unless the trust company 841 obtains a certificate of approval or is exempted from such 842 certificate under this section. 843 (a)âTo obtain a certificate of approval as a qualified 844 payment stablecoin issuer pursuant to this chapter, a trust 845 company must request such certificate in conjunction with an 846 application to organize a trust company pursuant to s. 658.19 or 847 apply for a certificate of approval as a qualified payment 848 stablecoin issuer on forms prescribed by rule of the commission 849 that meet the requirements of this section. The application must 850 require only information, documents, or materials that are 851 necessary to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria 852 provided in this section. 853 (b)âWith respect to any application for a certificate of 854 approval as a qualified payment stablecoin issuer pursuant to 855 this section, the office must comply with the following 856 requirements: 857 1.âUpon receipt of a substantially complete application, 858 evaluate and make a determination on each application based on 859 the criteria established in this section, including all of the 860 following factors: 861 a.âThe ability of the applicant, based on financial 862 condition and resources, to meet the requirements in subsection 863 (6). 864 b.âWhether an individual who has been convicted of a felony 865 offense involving insider trading, embezzlement, cybercrime, 866 money laundering, financing terrorism, or financial fraud is 867 serving as an officer or director of the applicant. 868 c.âThe competence, experience, and integrity of the 869 officers, directors, and principal shareholders of the 870 applicant, its subsidiaries, and parent company which includes, 871 but is not limited to: 872 (I)âThe record of those officers, directors, and principal 873 shareholders of compliance with laws and regulations; and 874 (II)âThe ability of those officers, directors, and 875 principal shareholders to fulfill any commitments to, and any 876 conditions imposed by, the office in connection with the 877 application at issue and any prior applications. 878 d.âWhether the redemption policy of the applicant meets the 879 standards under subsection (6). 880 e.âAny other factors necessary to ensure the safety and 881 soundness of the qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 882 2.âNot later than 120 days after receiving a substantially 883 complete application, render a decision on the application. 884 a.âAn application is considered substantially complete if 885 the application contains sufficient information for the office 886 to render a decision on whether the applicant satisfies the 887 factors described in this subparagraph. 888 b.âNot later than 30 days after receiving an application 889 under this section, the office must notify the applicant as to 890 whether the office considers the application to be substantially 891 complete and, if the application is not substantially complete, 892 the additional information the applicant must provide in order 893 for the application to be considered substantially complete. 894 c.âAn application considered substantially complete under 895 this subparagraph remains substantially complete unless there is 896 a material change in circumstances that requires the office to 897 treat the application as a new application. 898 3.âIf the applicant is approved as a qualified payment 899 stablecoin issuer, issue a certificate of approval to the 900 applicant. A certificate of approval remains valid unless or 901 until the office revokes such certificate pursuant to the 902 provisions of this chapter. 903 4.âDeny a substantially complete application received 904 pursuant to this subsection only if the office determines that 905 the activities of the applicant would be unsafe or unsound based 906 on the factors described in subparagraph 1. 907 a.âThe issuance of a payment stablecoin on an open, public, 908 or decentralized network is not a valid ground for denial of an 909 application for approval as a qualified payment stablecoin 910 issuer. 911 b.âIf the office denies a complete application submitted 912 pursuant to this subsection, not later than 30 days after the 913 date of such denial, the office must provide the applicant with 914 written notice explaining the denial with specificity, including 915 all findings made by the regulator with respect to all 916 identified material shortcomings in the application, along with 917 actionable recommendations on how the applicant could address 918 the identified material shortcomings. 919 c.âA denial entitles the applicant to an opportunity to be 920 heard pursuant to chapter 120. 921 5.âModify any current forms or rules relating to an 922 application to organize a trust company pursuant to s. 658.19 to 923 conform them to the standards and requirements of this section. 924 Any information or documents that are required for the office to 925 determine whether an applicant meets the requirements of this 926 section must be incorporated into an application to organize a 927 trust company so that an applicant may elect, but is not 928 required, to submit such information and documents to apply for 929 a certificate of approval as a qualified payment stablecoin 930 issuer as part of the organization process. 931 (c)âIf the office fails to render a decision on a complete 932 application within the time specified in subparagraph (b)2., the 933 application is deemed approved. 934 (d)âDenial of an application under this section may not 935 prohibit the applicant from filing a subsequent application. 936 (e)âFailure to comply with any provision of this section or 937 with any rule or order of the office is considered good cause 938 for revocation of a certificate of approval issued pursuant to 939 subparagraph (b)3. The office shall give prior written notice to 940 the qualified payment stablecoin issuer of such withdrawal 941 within a time prescribed by rule. 942 (3)âEXEMPTIONS.âEffective October 1, 2026, subsection (2) 943 does not apply to: 944 (a)âA federal-qualified payment stablecoin issuer. 945 (b)âAn out-of-state state-qualified payment stablecoin 946 issuer. The out-of-state state-qualified payment stablecoin 947 issuer must provide written notice to the office within 30 days 948 after engaging in the activity of a qualified payment stablecoin 949 issuer in this state. 950 (c)âThe following transactions are not regulated under this 951 part: 952 1.âThe direct transfer of payment stablecoin between two 953 individuals acting on their own behalf and for their own lawful 954 purposes, without the involvement of an intermediary. 955 2.âAny transaction involving the receipt of payment 956 stablecoin by an individual between an account owned by the 957 individual in the United States and an account owned by the 958 individual abroad which are offered by the same parent company. 959 3.âAny transaction by means of a software or hardware 960 wallet that facilitates an individualâs own custody of payment 961 stablecoins. 962 (d)âA payment stablecoin that meets the requirements of 963 this part is not a security and is not subject to the 964 requirements of chapter 517. 965 (4)âTRANSITION TO FEDERAL OVERSIGHT.âEffective October 1, 966 2026: 967 (a)âUnless a federal waiver is obtained, a qualified 968 payment stablecoin issuer with a consolidated total outstanding 969 payment stablecoin issuance that reaches the $10 billion 970 threshold must comply with one of the following requirements: 971 1.âNot later than 360 days after the payment stablecoin 972 issuance reaches such threshold, transition to the applicable 973 federal regulatory framework administered jointly by the office 974 and the appropriate federal regulator; or 975 2.âBeginning on the date the payment stablecoin issuance 976 reaches such threshold, cease issuing new payment stablecoins 977 until the payment stablecoin falls below the $10 billion 978 consolidated total outstanding issuance threshold. 979 (b)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer with a 980 consolidated total outstanding payment stablecoin issuance that 981 reaches the $10 billion threshold must, within 7 business days, 982 provide notice to the office that the threshold has been 983 reached. 984 (c)âTo the extent or for any relevant period for which a 985 waiver or transition applies, a qualified payment stablecoin 986 issuer remains subject to this part if a federal waiver of the 987 transition requirements in paragraph (a) is obtained pursuant to 988 the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, and the office remains 989 solely responsible for supervising the qualified payment 990 stablecoin issuer, or if the office is jointly responsible with 991 the United States Office of the Comptroller of the Currency to 992 supervise the qualified payment stablecoin issuer pursuant to 993 subparagraph (a)1. The office may enter into an agreement with 994 the relevant primary federal payment stablecoin regulator for 995 the joint supervision of any qualified payment stablecoin 996 issuer. 997 (5)âLIMITATION ON PAYMENT STABLECOIN ACTIVITIES.âEffective 998 October 1, 2026, a qualified payment stablecoin issuer that has 999 been issued a certificate of approval may engage only in the 1000 following activities: 1001 (a)âIssue payment stablecoins. 1002 (b)âRedeem payment stablecoins. 1003 (c)âManage related reserves, including purchasing, selling, 1004 and holding reserve assets or providing custodial services for 1005 reserve assets, consistent with federal law and the laws of this 1006 state. 1007 (d)âUndertake other activities that directly support any of 1008 the activities described in this section. 1009 (6)âMINIMUM PRUDENTIAL REQUIREMENTS.âEffective October 1, 1010 2026: 1011 (a)âIn accordance with the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, 1012 a qualified payment stablecoin issuer shall comply with all of 1013 the following requirements: 1014 1.âMaintain identifiable reserves backing the outstanding 1015 payment stablecoins of the qualified payment stablecoin issuer 1016 on at least a one-to-one basis, with reserves consisting of any 1017 of the following: 1018 a.âUnited States coin or currency or money standing to the 1019 credit of an account with a Federal Reserve Bank. 1020 b.âFunds held as demand deposits or insured shares at an 1021 insured depository institution, subject to limitations 1022 established by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the 1023 National Credit Union Administration. 1024 c.âUnited States Treasury bills, notes, or bonds with a 1025 remaining maturity or issued with a maturity of 93 days or less. 1026 d.âMoney received under repurchase agreements, with the 1027 qualified payment stablecoin issuer acting as a seller of 1028 securities and with an overnight maturity, that are backed by 1029 United States Treasury bills with a maturity of 93 days or less. 1030 e.âReverse purchase agreements, with the qualified payment 1031 stablecoin issuer acting as a purchaser of securities and with 1032 an overnight maturity, that are collateralized by United States 1033 Treasury bills, notes, or bonds on an overnight basis, subject 1034 to overcollateralization in line with standard market terms that 1035 meet federal requirements in the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 1036 f.âSecurities issued by an investment company registered 1037 under s. 8(a) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 1038 s. 80a-8(a), or other registered government money market fund, 1039 and that are invested solely in underlying assets described in 1040 subparagraphs a.-e. 1041 g.âAny other similarly liquid Federal Government-issued 1042 asset approved by the primary federal payment stablecoin 1043 regulator, in consultation with the office. 1044 h.âAny reserve described in subparagraphs 1., 2., and 3. or 1045 sub-subparagraphs f. and g in tokenized form, provided that such 1046 reserves comply with all applicable laws and regulations. 1047 2.âPublicly disclose the issuerâs redemption policy, which 1048 must comply with all of the following requirements: 1049 a.âEstablish clear and conspicuous procedures for timely 1050 redemption of outstanding payment stablecoins. 1051 b.âPublicly, clearly, and conspicuously disclose in plain 1052 language all fees associated with purchasing or redeeming the 1053 payment stablecoins, provided that such fees can be changed only 1054 upon not less than 7 daysâ prior notice to consumers. 1055 3.âPublish on the issuerâs website a monthly reserve 1056 composition of the issuerâs reserve which must contain all of 1057 the following information: 1058 a.âThe total number of outstanding payment stablecoins 1059 issued by the issuer. 1060 b.âThe amount and composition of the reserves described in 1061 subparagraph 1., including the average tenor and geographic 1062 location of custody of each category of reserve instruments. 1063 4.âComply with all federal prohibitions on the pledging, 1064 rehypothecating, or reusing reserve assets, either directly or 1065 indirectly, except for any of the following purposes: 1066 a.âSatisfying margin obligations in connection with 1067 investments in permitted reserves under sub-subparagraph 1.d. or 1068 sub-subparagraph (a)1.e. 1069 b.âSatisfying obligations associated with the use, receipt, 1070 or provision of standard custodial services. 1071 c.âCreating liquidity to meet reasonable expectations of 1072 requests to redeem payment stablecoins, such that reserves in 1073 the form of United States Treasury bills may be sold as 1074 purchased securities for repurchase agreements with a maturity 1075 of 93 days or less, provided that either: 1076 (I)âThe repurchase agreements are cleared by a clearing 1077 agency registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission; 1078 or 1079 (II)âThe qualified payment stablecoin issuer receives prior 1080 approval from the office. 1081 5.âEngage a registered public accounting firm to conduct a 1082 monthly examination of the previous month-end reserve report. 1083 For purposes of this subparagraph, the term âregistered public 1084 accounting firmâ means a public accounting firm registered with 1085 the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board. 1086 6.âSubmit to the office each month a certification as to 1087 the accuracy of the month-end reserve report by the qualified 1088 payment stablecoin issuerâs chief executive officer and chief 1089 financial officer. Whoever knowingly makes a false statement in 1090 writing with the intent to mislead a public servant in the 1091 performance of his or her official duty commits a misdemeanor of 1092 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1093 775.083. 1094 7.âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer with more than $50 1095 billion in consolidated total outstanding issuance shall 1096 prepare, in accordance with generally accepted accounting 1097 principles, an annual financial statement, which must include 1098 disclosure of any related party transactions, as defined by such 1099 generally accepted accounting principles. 1100 a.âA registered public accounting firm must perform an 1101 audit of the annual financial statements. 1102 b.âEach qualified payment stablecoin issuer required to 1103 prepare an audited annual financial statement must comply with 1104 all of the following requirements: 1105 (I)âMake such audited financial statements publicly 1106 available on the website of the permitted payment stablecoin 1107 issuer; and 1108 (II)âSubmit such audited financial statements annually to 1109 the office. 1110 8.âComply with any federal regulations or rules prescribed 1111 by the commission relating to capital, liquidity, and risk 1112 management requirements. 1113 9.âEngage only custodians or safekeepers that comply with 1114 s. 10 of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27. 1115 10.âComply with any other federal requirements of s. 4(a) 1116 of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119-27, and any implementing 1117 federal regulations. 1118 (b)âA qualified payment stablecoin issuer is prohibited 1119 from engaging in all of the following conduct: 1120 1.âExcept as may be authorized under federal law, tying 1121 arrangements that condition access to stablecoin services on the 1122 purchase of unrelated products or services from such qualified 1123 payment stablecoin issuer or an agreement not to obtain products 1124 or services from a competitor. 1125 2.âUsing deceptive names, which includes, but is not 1126 limited to, any of the following: 1127 a.âUsing any combination of terms relating to the United 1128 States Government, except abbreviations directly related to the 1129 currency to which a payment stablecoin is pegged, such as âUSD.â 1130 b.âMarketing a payment stablecoin in such a way that a 1131 reasonable person would perceive the payment stablecoin to be 1132 legal tender, as described in 31 U.S.C. s. 5103, issued by the 1133 United States, or guaranteed or approved by the United States 1134 Government. 1135 3.âPaying the holder of any payment stablecoin any form of 1136 interest or yield solely in connection with holding, use, or 1137 retention of such payment stablecoin if such payment is 1138 prohibited under federal law. 1139 (7)âCERTIFICATION.âThe officeâs initial certification and 1140 annual recertification submission to the federal Stablecoin 1141 Certification Review Committee pursuant to s. 560.505 must 1142 include any relevant information related to the provisions of 1143 this chapter in the officeâs request for certification or 1144 recertification of the state regulatory regime of payment 1145 stablecoins. 1146 (8)âRULEMAKING.âThe commission may adopt rules to 1147 administer this section as required in s. 13 of the GENIUS Act, 1148 Pub. L. No. 119-27. The commission must also adopt rules 1149 relating to capital, liquidity, and risk management which are 1150 consistent with s. 4(a)(4) of the GENIUS Act, Pub. L. No. 119 1151 27. The commission may adopt rules establishing standards for 1152 the conduct, supervision, examination, and regulation of 1153 qualified payment stablecoin issuers, including requirements 1154 relating to reserves, customer-asset protection, reporting, and 1155 compliance in order to meet the minimum requirements established 1156 by the Stablecoin Certification Review Committee. 1157 Section 14.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 1158 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.